Arkansas, session 2025, SB394.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-164-337(a), concerning the pledge of
preexisting sales and use tax under the Local Government Bond Act of 1985, is
amended to read as follows:
(a) In Except as provided in § 26-74-214(c)(1)(B), in any municipality
or county which has in effect the levy of a local sales and use tax, the
legislative body may, by ordinance, pledge all or a specified portion of the
existing tax to retire its bonds as provided in this subchapter.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-74-208(c), concerning the form of the
*JLL049*
03-13-2025 14:33:35 JLL049

As Engrossed: S3/13/25 SB394
ballot for a county sales and use tax for capital improvements, is amended to
read as follows:
(c)(1)(A) The ballot may also indicate designated uses of the revenues
derived from the sales and use tax or the allocation or distribution of
revenues, or both, and if the tax is approved, the proceeds shall only be
used for the designated purposes and distributed in the manner set forth in
the ballot.
(B) The county's share of the proceeds may be used for
other designated purposes if the electors approve a change in the designated
use of the revenues by vote under this subsection.
(2)(A)(i) The quorum court of a county may refer to the vote of
the people a change in the indicated use of revenues derived from a sales and
use tax levied by the county that was approved by the voters, but a change
shall not alter the allocation of tax collections among the county and
municipalities within the county or, if the requirement of subdivision
(c)(2)(A)(ii) of this section is met, a change in the allocation or
distribution of revenues among the county and the municipalities within the
county.
(ii) The quorum court of a county may refer to the
vote of the people a change in the allocation or distribution of revenues
among the county and the municipalities within the county only if the
population of the largest municipality in the county exceeds the population
of the unincorporated areas of the county, according to the most recent
federal decennial census.
(B) If the quorum court of a county refers to the vote of
the people a change in the indicated use of revenues derived from a sales and
use tax or a change in the allocation of tax collections among the county and
the municipalities within the county, or both, the quorum court shall:
(i) Notify the county board of election
commissioners that the measure has been referred to the vote of the people;
and
(ii) Submit a copy of the ballot title to the county
board of election commissioners.
(C)(i) An election to change the indicated use of revenues
derived from a sales and use tax or to change the allocation or distribution
of revenues among the county and the municipalities within the county, or
03-13-2025 14:33:35 JLL049

As Engrossed: S3/13/25 SB394
both, shall be conducted in the manner provided by law for all other county
elections.
(ii) The results of an election under this
subsection shall be certified, proclaimed, and subject to challenge under the
procedures stated in § 26-74-209.
(3)(A) If the voters approve a change in the indicated use of
revenues derived from a sales and use tax, the change in the indicated use
shall apply to all revenues collected on the first day of the calendar month
following the expiration of the thirty-day challenge period under § 26-74-
209.
(B) If the voters approve a change in the allocation or
distribution of revenues among the county and the municipalities within the
county, the county shall notify the Treasurer of State of the new allocation
or distribution of revenues among the county and the municipalities within
the county that was approved by the voters after publication of the
proclamation has occurred and at least ninety (90) days before the new
allocation or distribution becomes effective.
(4)(A) If the voters do not approve a change in the indicated
use of revenues derived from a sales and use tax, the tax shall continue to
be collected and the revenues derived from the tax shall continue to be used
for the purposes indicated in the ballot for the tax.
(B) If the voters do not approve a change in the
allocation or distribution of revenues among the county and the
municipalities within the county:
(i) The tax shall continue to be collected; and
(ii) There shall be no change in the allocation or
distribution of the revenues derived from the tax.
(C) An election to change the indicated use of revenues
derived from a sales and use tax or to change the allocation or distribution
of revenues among the county and municipalities, or both, shall not
constitute an election on the levy of the tax.
(5) Notwithstanding anything in this subchapter to the contrary,
in any county that a local sales and use tax has been adopted in the manner
provided for in this subchapter and a portion of the revenues derived from
the tax has been pledged to secure lease rentals or bonds, the purpose for
the tax may not be changed to reduce the pledge in favor of the lease or
03-13-2025 14:33:35 JLL049

As Engrossed: S3/13/25 SB394
bonds.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 26-74-214(c)(1), concerning the disposition
of funds received from a county sales and use tax for capital improvements,
is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1)(A) Funds Except as provided in subdivision (c)(1)(B) of this
section, funds received by the counties and municipalities pursuant to the
provisions of this subchapter may be used by the counties and municipalities
for any purpose for which the county general funds or the city general funds
may be used, subject to designations set forth in the ballot, if any.
(B) A municipality shall not pledge revenues from a tax
levied under this subchapter for the repayment of bonds.

/s/J. Bryant






















03-13-2025 14:33:35 JLL049